Utah statutes.
75-3-1008.   Subsequent administration.
If other property of the estate is discovered after an estate has been settled
and the personal representative discharged or after one year after a closing
statement has been filed, the court upon petition of any interested person and
upon notice as it directs may appoint the same or a successor personal
representative to administer the subsequently-discovered estate. If a new
appointment is made, unless the court orders otherwise, the provisions of this
code apply as appropriate; but no claim previously barred may be asserted in
the subsequent administration.
